Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-432
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-432 to 79-451 shall be known and may be cited as the Reorganization of School Districts Act.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 19, p. 679;

R.R.S.1943, (1958), § 79-426.19;

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 15, p. 1545;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.22;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 181;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 11.